Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 10. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 06.60.890.
Application to Internet activities.

This chapter applies to a person even if the person is engaging in the activities regulated by this chapter by using an Internet website from within or outside the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 79 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.895.
Effect of revocation, suspension, or surrender of license.

The revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license does not impair or otherwise affect the rights or obligations of a preexisting lawful contract between the licensee and a borrower.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.900.
Applicability of administrative procedures.

Notwithstanding AS

06.01.030(f)

, the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) apply to an action of the department to deny, revoke, or suspend a license or registration under this chapter, to censure, suspend, or bar a person under AS

06.60.410

, to take other disciplinary action under this chapter, to hold disciplinary hearings, and to issue disciplinary orders. In this section, “registration” means the registration of a depository institution under AS

06.60.014

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 80 ch 61 SLA 2010; am § 18 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, inserted “or registration” preceding “under this chapter” in the first sentence; added the second sentence.

Sec. 06.60.905.
Untrue, misleading, or false statements.

A person may not, in a document filed with the department or in an examination, an investigation, a hearing, or another proceeding under this chapter, make or cause to be made an untrue statement of a material fact, or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statement made, in the light of the circumstances under which it is made, not misleading or false.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 81 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.910.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

For registration as a small mortgage lender or small mortgage originator, see 3 AAC 14, art. 2.

For originator competency testing and continuing education, see 3 AAC 14, art. 3.

For license duration, renewal, inactivity, and surrender, see 3 AAC 14, art. 4.

For licensee obligations, see 3 AAC 14, art. 5.

For business duties and restrictions, and disciplinary action, see 3 AAC 14, art. 6.

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.920.
Relationship to federal and other state law.

If a provision of this chapter is preempted by or conflicts with federal law in a particular situation, the provision does not apply to the extent of the preemption or conflict.

If a provision of this chapter conflicts with another state law in a particular situation, the provision in this chapter governs to the extent of the conflict.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)